District of Columbia statutes.
2-633

Repealed

Report.

Repealed.

Sept. 29, 2006, D.C. Law 16-169, § 4, 53 DCR 6223
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 6(b), 59 DCR 5567
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.